Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5641.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "Michigan international trade commission act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Commission" means the Michigan international trade commission created in section 5. (b) "Department" means the department of labor and economic opportunity. (c) "Director" means the director of the department. Sec. 5. (1) The Michigan international trade commission is created within the department. (2) The governor shall appoint the members of the commission. The commission must consist of the following members: (a) A member who represents the agricultural sector. (b) A member who represents the shipping or transportation industry. (c) A member who represents the health care sector. (d) A member who represents automotive manufacturing. (e) A member who represents financial, legal, or insurance services. (f) 2 members who are experts in international trade policy, 1 of whom is a professor at a college or university in this state. (g) A member who represents organized labor. (3) The governor shall appoint the first members of the commission not more than 30 days after the effective date of this act. (4) The governor shall appoint 3 of the first members to 1-year terms, 2 of the first members to 2-year terms, and 3 of the first members to 3-year terms. After the first appointments, the term of a member of the commission is 3 years or until a successor is appointed, whichever is later. (5) If a vacancy occurs in the commission, the governor shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (6) The chairperson may remove a member of the commission for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. Sec. 7. (1) The director shall call the first meeting of the commission. At the first meeting, the commission shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that the commission considers necessary or appropriate. The commission shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of 4 or more members. (2) A majority of the members of the commission constitute a quorum for transacting business. A majority of the members of the commission serving are required for any action of the commission. (3) The commission shall conduct the commission's business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (4) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the commission in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (5) A member of the commission is not entitled to compensation for service on the commission, but the commission may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. Sec. 9. The commission shall do all of the following: (a) Provide independent analysis and information on international trade and competitiveness as it relates to industries and trade in this state. (b) Inform the public as to the relative competitiveness of businesses in this state in international markets. (c) Provide the legislature with a quarterly analysis on the trade impact of tariffs on industries in this state. (d) Make recommendations to the legislature and the governor on how this state can improve this state's global economic competitiveness.